trunk/incubator/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="cyk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="salut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="risi/ko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciene</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koen</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koerne</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koer</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ko</l>
          <r>ko<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/atter__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atteren</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atter</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtrene</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øtre</l>
          <r>atter<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drage__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eng/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tog__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bid__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="n/at__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætterne</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ætter</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>atten</l>
          <r>at<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="anslag"><i>anslag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnerov"><i>barnerov</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="birkesfrø"><i>birkesfrø</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bovensejl"><i>bovensejl</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bygkorn"><i>bygkorn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="display"><i>display</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyreforsøg"><i>dyreforsøg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="essay"><i>essay</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fingersprog"><i>fingersprog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fogedforbud"><i>fogedforbud</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fredsvalg"><i>fredsvalg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gevind"><i>gevind</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hareskår"><i>hareskår</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvidløg"><i>hvidløg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kartotekskort"><i>kartotekskort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunstgreb"><i>kunstgreb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyntog"><i>lyntog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="næsehorn"><i>næsehorn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opspring"><i>opspring</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primærvalg"><i>primærvalg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rejespring"><i>rejespring</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rummål"><i>rummål</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skadedyr"><i>skadedyr</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skohorn"><i>skohorn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skydeskår"><i>skydeskår</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spisekort"><i>spisekort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="støvgran"><i>støvgran</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="terrænløb"><i>terrænløb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trossamfund"><i>trossamfund</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vandfald"><i>vandfald</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afskrivningsgrundlag"><i>afskrivningsgrundlag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apsistelt"><i>apsistelt</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bål"><i>bål</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="billetkøb"><i>billetkøb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolt"><i>bolt</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bruttotrækkort"><i>bruttotrækkort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dæksblad"><i>dæksblad</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="døgn"><i>døgn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="efterkravsbeløb"><i>efterkravsbeløb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erstatningskrav"><i>erstatningskrav</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fejltrin"><i>fejltrin</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fladbrød"><i>fladbrød</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forbehold"><i>forbehold</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="franskbrød"><i>franskbrød</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavlhus"><i>gavlhus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="halsbånd"><i>halsbånd</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hønsehus"><i>hønsehus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="interrailkort"><i>interrailkort</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kiks"><i>kiks</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korthus"><i>korthus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="langbord"><i>langbord</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mæglingsforslag"><i>mæglingsforslag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="murermesterhus"><i>murermesterhus</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ombygningsudsalg"><i>ombygningsudsalg</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="påfund"><i>påfund</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prokuratorkneb"><i>prokuratorkneb</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reservefond"><i>reservefond</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rykkerbrev"><i>rykkerbrev</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sejl"><i>sejl</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skær"><i>skær</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skråbånd"><i>skråbånd</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slangeskind"><i>slangeskind</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sogneråd"><i>sogneråd</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spotlight"><i>spotlight</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stikkelsbærben"><i>stikkelsbærben</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="studienævn"><i>studienævn</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taffelur"><i>taffelur</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilbagetog"><i>tilbagetog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tov"><i>tov</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvivlsmål"><i>tvivlsmål</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="underholdsbidrag"><i>underholdsbidrag</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vår"><i>vår</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
